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DTC P 1760/77|Linear Solenoid for Line Pressure Control
Circuit Malfunction (SLT Solenoid Valve)

Line Pressure Con-
trol Pressure

|

CurrentFlowto Solenoid D0263

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The throttle pressure that is applied to the primary regulator
valve (which modulates line pressure) causes the SLT solenoid
valve, under electronic control, to precisely and minutely modu-
lates and generates line pressure according to the accelerator
pedal effort, or engine power output detected.

This reduces the function of line pressure and provides smooth
shifting characteristics.

Uponreceiving thethrottle valve opening angle signal, Engine
and ECT ECU controls the line pressure by sending a predeter-
mined (*) duty ratio to the solenoid valve, modulating the line
pressure, generating throttle pressure.

ON A (*) Duty Ratio
The duty ratio is the ratio of the period of continuity in one cycle.
B For example, if A is the period of continuity in one cycle, and B
OFF L isthe periodofnon  —continuity, then
1 cycle
e~
. A o
BE4056 Duty Ratio = —x——pg— x 100 (%)
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
(a) or (b) condition below is detected for 1 second or more. * Openorshortin SLT solenoid valve circuit

P1760/77 (@) SLT _terminal: 0V
(b) SLT terminal: 12V
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Reference
Refertothe chartforthe wave formbetweenterminals SLT
andSLT duringengineidling.
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WIRING DIAGRAM

Engine and ECT ECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check SLT solenoid valve.

PREPARATION:

P~ @1 (@) Jack up the vehicle.
@) (b) Remove the oil pan.
A4 L (c) Disconnect the solenoid connector.

Check solenoid resistance:
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of solenoid con-

g nector.

OK:
777 A AT, Resistance: 5.0 - 5.6 Q at 20 °C (68°F)
L',I;E;.!,/ Check solenoid operation:
i —— CHECK:

Connect positive (+) lead with an 8 — 10 W bulb to terminal 1 of
solenoid connector and negative (-) lead to terminal 2, then
check the movement of the valve.

OK:
. . . Valve movesin « direction in
Dotss ﬁ‘\ Whenbattery positive voltageisapplied. the illustration on the left.
D01889
D01887 ~ D02235 Valvemovesinm m *direction in

When battery positive voltage is cut off.

intheillustrationontheleft.

NG> Replace SLT solenoid valve.

@

2 | Check harness and connector between SLT solenoid valve and Engine and ECT
ECU (See page IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

Check and replace Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN-35).
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